Washington statutes.
RCW 18.52.071

Qualifications of licensees.

The department shall issue a license to any person applying for a nursing home administrator's license who meets the following requirements:

(1) Successful completion of the requirements for a baccalaureate degree from a recognized institution of higher learning and any federal requirements;

(2) Successful completion of a practical experience requirement as determined by the board;

(3) Successful completion of examinations administered or approved by the board, or both, which shall be designed to test the candidate's competence to administer a nursing home;

(4) At least twenty-one years of age; and

(5) Not having engaged in unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW 18.130.180 or being unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety as defined in RCW 18.130.170. The board shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the above requirements.

A limited license indicating the limited extent of authority to administer institutions conducted by and for those who rely upon treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance with the creed or tenets of any well-recognized church or religious denomination shall be issued to individuals demonstrating membership in such church or denomination. However, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require an applicant employed by such institution to demonstrate proficiency in any medical techniques or to meet any medical educational qualifications or medical standards not in accord with the remedial care and treatment provided in such institutions.

[ 1996 c 271 s 1; 1992 c 53 s 7.]